District of Columbia statutes.
29A-221.25

Repealed

Injunction against assuming corporate franchise or transacting business not authorized by charter.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1320, ch. 854, § 793
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 534, ch. 1329
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 909, ch. 646, §§ 1, 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, §§ 155(c)(1)(I), 169(3)
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(3), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-725.
1981 Ed., § 29-425.
2001 Ed., § 29-221.25.